Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.370

Referees' report of sale—Contents.

After completing the sale, the referees shall report the same to the court, with a description of the different parcels of land sold to each purchaser, the name of the purchaser, the price paid or secured, the terms and conditions of the sale, and the securities, if any, taken. The report shall be filed with the clerk.

[Code 1881 s 588; 1877 p 122 s 593; 1869 p 140 s 542; RRS s 874.]